incubator/apertium-ces-ces/apertium-ces-ces.ces_han.dix
    <pardef n="my/slet__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>slet</l>
        <r>slet<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="inf"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>



    <e>
      <p>
        <l>slím</l>
        <r>slet<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>slíš</l>
        <r>slet<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>slí</l>
        <r>slet<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>slíme</l>
        <r>slet<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>slíte</l>
        <r>slet<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>slejí</l>
        <r>slet<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>slí</l>
        <r>slet<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>



    <e>
      <p>
        <l>slel</l>
        <r>slet<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="past"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="BASE__četl"/> 
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>šlen</l>
        <r>slet<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="BASE__chtěn"/> 
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>šlení</l>
        <r>slet<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="ger"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="BASE__utery"/> 
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>slejíc</l>
        <r>slet<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="adj"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="BASE__další"/> 
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>šlen</l>
        <r>slet<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pp"/><s n="adj"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="BASE__nov/ý"/> 
    </e>



    <e>
      <p>
        <l>sleje</l>
        <r>slet<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tgv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>sleje</l>
        <r>slet<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tgv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>slejíc</l>
        <r>slet<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tgv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>slejíc</l>
        <r>slet<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tgv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>slejíce</l>
        <r>slet<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tgv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>slejíce</l>
        <r>slet<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tgv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>slejíce</l>
        <r>slet<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tgv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>



    <e>
      <p>
        <l>sli</l>
        <r>slet<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>sleme</l>
        <r>slet<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>slete</l>
        <r>slet<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>šlen</l>
        <r>slet<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pp"/><s n="impers"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="BASE__četl"/> 
    </e>


    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ch/tít__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>tít</l>
        <r>tít<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="inf"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>



    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ci</l>
        <r>tít<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ceš</l>
        <r>tít<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ce</l>
        <r>tít<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ceme</l>
        <r>tít<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>cete</l>
        <r>tít<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>tějí</l>
        <r>tít<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>



    <e>
      <p>
        <l>těl</l>
        <r>tít<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="past"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="BASE__četl"/> 
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>těn</l>
        <r>tít<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="BASE__chtěn"/> 
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>těn</l>
        <r>tít<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pp"/><s n="adj"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="BASE__nov/ý"/> 
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>tějíc</l>
        <r>tít<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="adj"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="BASE__další"/> 
    </e>



    <e>
      <p>
        <l>těje</l>
        <r>tít<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tgv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>těje</l>
        <r>tít<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tgv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>tě</l>
        <r>tít<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tgv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>tě</l>
        <r>tít<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tgv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>tějíc</l>
        <r>tít<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tgv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>tějíc</l>
        <r>tít<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tgv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>tíc</l>
        <r>tít<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tgv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>tíc</l>
        <r>tít<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tgv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>tějíce</l>
        <r>tít<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tgv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>tějíce</l>
        <r>tít<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tgv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>tějíce</l>
        <r>tít<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tgv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>tíce</l>
        <r>tít<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tgv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>tíce</l>
        <r>tít<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tgv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>tíce</l>
        <r>tít<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tgv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>



    <e>
      <p>
        <l>těj</l>
        <r>tít<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="BASE__udrž"/> 
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>těn</l>
        <r>tít<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pp"/><s n="impers"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="BASE__četl"/> 
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <e lm="chtít"><par n="v_neg"/><i>ch</i><par n="ch/tít__vblex"/></e>
